Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.195

Medicare supplemental insurance policies.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or rules or procedures adopted by the authority, the authority shall make available to retired or disabled employees who are enrolled in parts A and B of medicare one or more medicare supplemental insurance policies that conform to the requirements of chapter 48.66 RCW. The policies shall be chosen in consultation with the public employees' benefits board. These policies shall be made available to retired or disabled state employees; retired or disabled school district employees; retired employees of employer groups eligible for coverage available under the authority; or surviving spouses or surviving state registered domestic partners of emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty.

[ 2023 c 13 s 6; 2015 c 116 s 7; 2009 c 523 s 2; 2007 c 114 s 7; 2005 c 47 s 1; 1993 c 492 s 222.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 13: See note following RCW 41.05.011.

Intent—Effective date—2007 c 114: See notes following RCW 41.05.011.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.